sv: Hockeystorlekskategori: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Ungdom; Annat
pt-BR: Categoria do tamanho do hóquei: Intermediário; Júnior; Sênior; Jovem; Outros
fr: Catégorie de taille au hockey: Intermédiaire; Junior; Sénior; Jeunesse; Autre
bg-BG: Категория размер за хокей: Междинен; За юноши; За възрастни; За деца; Други
nl: Hockey-maatcategorie: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Jeugd; Overig
pl: Kategoria wielkości artykułu do hokeja: Pośredni; Junior; Senior; Dziecięcy; Inna
ja: ホッケーサイズカテゴリー: インターミディエイト; ジュニア; シニア; ユース; その他
it: Categoria di taglia dell'hockey: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Altro
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους χόκεϊ: Ενδιάμεσο; Junior; Senior; Παιδικό; Άλλο
de: Größe des Hockeyschlägers nach Kategorie: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Jugend; Andere
sk-SK: Veľkostná kategória pri hokeji: Stredná (Intermediate); Juniorská; Seniorská; Detská; Iné
ko: 하키 크기 범주: 인터미디어트; 주니어; 시니어; 유스; 기타
th: หมวดหมู่ขนาดฮอกกี้: ระดับกลาง; จูเนียร์; ซีเนียร์; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kategorija veličine hokeja: Srednji; Juniorski; Seniorski; Za mlade; Ostalo
fi: Jääkiekon kokokategoria: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Muu
da: Hockeystørrelseskategori: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Andet
vi: Nhóm kích cỡ đồ dùng khúc côn cầu: Trung cấp; Thanh thiếu niên; Người lớn; Trẻ em; Khác
en: Hockey size category: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Other
es: Categoría de tamaño de hockey: Intermedio; Júnior; Sénior; Infantil; Otro
ro-RO: Categorie de mărime pentru hochei: Intermediar; Junior; Senior; Tineret; Altele
ru: Размерная категория хоккея: Подростковый; Юниорский; Взрослый; Детский; Другое
cs: Velikostní kategorie pro hokej: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Dětská (Youth); Jiná
zh-CN: 冰球/曲棍球杆尺寸类别: 中级; 少年; 成人; 儿童; 其他
tr: Hokey boyut kategorisi: Orta; Genç; Yetişkin; Çocuk; Diğer
lt-LT: Ledo ritulio lazdų dydžio kategorija: Paauglių (Intermediate); Jaunių; Suaugusiųjų; Vaikų; Kita
hu: Hoki méretkategória: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Gyerek; Egyéb
pt-PT: Classificação do tamanho no hóquei: Intermédio; Júnior; Sénior; Jovem; Outro
sl-SI: Kategorija velikosti za hokej: Srednja; Mladinska; Članska; Otroška; Drugo
zh-TW: 曲棍球尺寸分類: 中級; 青少年用; 成人用; 兒童用; 其他
nb: Størrelseskategori for hockey: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Annet